Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 285C.609 is amended to read:
285C.609. (1) A determination under ORS 285C.606 (1) by the Oregon  Business Development
Commission that a  project shall be exempt from property taxation under ORS 307.123 must be re-
quested by official action of the governing body of the county in which the proposed eligible
project will be located, taken at a regular or duly called special meeting [ thereof] of the governing
body. The request shall require approval  by the affirmative vote of a  majority of [ its] the mem-
bers of the governing body .
(2) The governing body of [ any Oregon ] a county shall  forward [ appropriate prospective ] ap-
proved eligible projects to the Oregon Business Development Department for processing.
(3) For purposes of this section,  for projects located on a federally recognized Oregon Indian
reservation,  the  governing body of a county shall be considered [ to be ] the governing body of the
federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe.
(4) The county may not make the request under subsection (1) of this section unless, after a
public hearing:
(a) The county and, if the proposed eligible project will be  located within the boundaries of a
city or affected port, the city or affected port  have entered into an agreement with the business
firm, as described in this subsection. The Oregon  Business Development Department shall make
available, in a timely manner, training materials related to  negotiation techniques in such circum-
stances to the county, city or affected port, as applicable.
(b) The agreement provides for the payment of a fee by the business firm, as follows:
(A) The fee shall be for community services support  that relates to the direct impact of the el-
igible project on public services.
(B) The fee shall be in an amount equal to 25 percent of the property taxes that would, but  for
the exemption, be due on the exempt property in each assessment year, but not  exceeding $3 million
in any year.
(C) The fee shall be paid annually during  the tax exemption period, as of a date set forth in the
agreement.
(c) The agreement provides for the  refunding or crediting of overpayments, for interest on late
payments or underpayments and for the manner  in which the appeal of the assessed value of the
property included in the project will affect the fee.
Enrolled House Bill 2725 (HB 2725-A) Page 1
(5) The maximum fee amount allowed under subsection (4)(b)  of this section shall be adjusted
each year for the property tax year beginning on July 1 by multiplying $3 million  by the ratio of
the increase, if any, in the monthly averaged Consumer  Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West
Region, for the 12 consecutive months ending December 31  of the prior calendar year over the
monthly averaged index for the 12 consecutive months ending December  31, 2023. The amount of
any increase determined under this subsection shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of $1,000.
(6) The agreement described in subsection  (4) of this section may provide for any other re-
quirements related to the project.
(7)(a) The fee collected under subsection (4)(b) of this section shall  be distributed by the county
based on an agreement. The agreement is effective  only if the following public bodies have entered
into the agreement:
(A) The county and the city or affected port, if any, in which the eligible project is located;
(B) All special districts in the code  area in which the eligible project is located that provide
services related to public safety, fire prevention and  response, ambulance or other emergency med-
ical response or emergency communications; and
(C) Local taxing districts listed in ORS  198.010 or 198.180, other than affected ports, that con-
stitute at least  75 percent of the property tax authority of all local taxing districts listed in ORS
198.010 or 198.180, other than affected ports, in the code area in which the eligible  project is lo-
cated.
(b) If an effective agreement  is not entered into under paragraph (a) of this subsection within
three months after the date of the determination by the commission under ORS 285C.606  (1), the
commission shall, by official action, establish a formula for distributing the  fee collected under
subsection (4)(b) of this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 285C.600 is amended to read:
285C.600. As used in ORS 285C.600 to 285C.635:
(1) “Affected port” means:
(a) A port district located east of the westernmost dam on the Columbia River; or
(b) A port district that owns land  on which any part of a proposed eligible project will
be located.
[(1)] (2) “Business firm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285C.050.
[(2)] (3) “Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region” means  the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
[(3)] (4) “Eligible  project” means a project that meets criteria established by the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Commission to be exempt from property taxation under ORS 307.123.
[(4)] (5) “First-source hiring agreement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285C.050.
[(5)] (6) “Newly created jobs” means, for an eligible project, total jobs less retained jobs.
[(6)] (7) “Publicly funded job training provider” has the meaning given that  term in ORS
285C.050.
[(7)] (8) “Rural area” means  an area located entirely outside of the urban growth boundary of
a city with a population of 40,000 or more, as the urban growth boundary is  acknowledged on the
date on which an  applicant submits an application, pursuant to rules adopted by the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department, for property tax exemption under ORS 307.123.
[(8)] (9) “Strategic investment zone”  means a geographic area established under ORS 285C.623,
within which the property of eligible projects  may be exempt from property taxation under ORS
307.123.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 285C.600 and 285C.609 by sections 1 and 2  of this
2025 Act apply to requests made under ORS 285C.609 on  or after the effective date of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2725 (HB 2725-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2725 (HB 2725-A) Page 3